Illinois, session 104th, HB2480.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Labor Relations Act is 5amended by changing Section 14 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 315/14)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1614)7    Sec. 14. Security employee, peace officer and fire fighter 8disputes. 9    (a) In the case of collective bargaining agreements 10involving units of security employees of a public employer, 11Peace Officer Units, or units of fire fighters or paramedics, 12and in the case of disputes under Section 18, unless the 13parties mutually agree to some other time limit, mediation 14shall commence 30 days prior to the expiration date of such 15agreement or at such later time as the mediation services 16chosen under subsection (b) of Section 12 can be provided to 17the parties. In the case of negotiations for an initial 18collective bargaining agreement, mediation shall commence upon 1915 days notice from either party or at such later time as the 20mediation services chosen pursuant to subsection (b) of 21Section 12 can be provided to the parties. In mediation under 22this Section, if either party requests the use of mediation 23services from the Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service,   HB2480- 2 -LRB104 08612 BDA 18664 b1the other party shall either join in such request or bear the 2additional cost of mediation services from another source. The 3mediator shall have a duty to keep the Board informed on the 4progress of the mediation. If any dispute has not been 5resolved within 15 days after the first meeting of the parties 6and the mediator, or within such other time limit as may be 7mutually agreed upon by the parties, either the exclusive 8representative or employer may request of the other, in 9writing, arbitration, and shall submit a copy of the request 10to the Board.11    (b) Within 10 days after such a request for arbitration 12has been made, the employer shall choose a delegate and the 13employees' exclusive representative shall choose a delegate to 14a panel of arbitration as provided in this Section. The 15employer and employees shall forthwith advise the other and 16the Board of their selections.17    (c) Within 7 days after the request of either party, the 18parties shall request a panel of impartial arbitrators from 19which they shall select the neutral chairman according to the 20procedures provided in this Section. If the parties have 21agreed to a contract that contains a grievance resolution 22procedure as provided in Section 8, the chairman shall be 23selected using their agreed contract procedure unless they 24mutually agree to another procedure. If the parties fail to 25notify the Board of their selection of neutral chairman within 267 days after receipt of the list of impartial arbitrators, the   HB2480- 3 -LRB104 08612 BDA 18664 b1Board shall appoint, at random, a neutral chairman from the 2list. In the absence of an agreed contract procedure for 3selecting an impartial arbitrator, either party may request a 4panel from the Board. Within 7 days of the request of either 5party, the Board shall select from the Public Employees Labor 6Mediation Roster 7 persons who are on the labor arbitration 7panels of either the American Arbitration Association or the 8Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service, or who are members 9of the National Academy of Arbitrators, as nominees for 10impartial arbitrator of the arbitration panel. The parties may 11select an individual on the list provided by the Board or any 12other individual mutually agreed upon by the parties. Within 7 13days following the receipt of the list, the parties shall 14notify the Board of the person they have selected. Unless the 15parties agree on an alternate selection procedure, they shall 16alternatively strike one name from the list provided by the 17Board until only one name remains. A coin toss shall determine 18which party shall strike the first name. If the parties fail to 19notify the Board in a timely manner of their selection for 20neutral chairman, the Board shall appoint a neutral chairman 21from the Illinois Public Employees Mediation/Arbitration 22Roster.23    (d) The chairman shall call a hearing to begin within 15 24days and give reasonable notice of the time and place of the 25hearing. The hearing shall be held at the offices of the Board 26or at such other location as the Board deems appropriate. The   HB2480- 4 -LRB104 08612 BDA 18664 b1chairman shall preside over the hearing and shall take 2testimony. Any oral or documentary evidence and other data 3deemed relevant by the arbitration panel may be received in 4evidence. The proceedings shall be informal. Technical rules 5of evidence shall not apply and the competency of the evidence 6shall not thereby be deemed impaired. A verbatim record of the 7proceedings shall be made and the arbitrator shall arrange for 8the necessary recording service. Transcripts may be ordered at 9the expense of the party ordering them, but the transcripts 10shall not be necessary for a decision by the arbitration 11panel. The expense of the proceedings, including a fee for the 12chairman, shall be borne equally by each of the parties to the 13dispute. The delegates, if public officers or employees, shall 14continue on the payroll of the public employer without loss of 15pay. The hearing conducted by the arbitration panel may be 16adjourned from time to time, but unless otherwise agreed by 17the parties, shall be concluded within 30 days of the time of 18its commencement. Majority actions and rulings shall 19constitute the actions and rulings of the arbitration panel. 20Arbitration proceedings under this Section shall not be 21interrupted or terminated by reason of any unfair labor 22practice charge filed by either party at any time.23    (e) The arbitration panel may administer oaths, require 24the attendance of witnesses, and the production of such books, 25papers, contracts, agreements and documents as may be deemed 26by it material to a just determination of the issues in   HB2480- 5 -LRB104 08612 BDA 18664 b1dispute, and for such purpose may issue subpoenas. If any 2person refuses to obey a subpoena, or refuses to be sworn or to 3testify, or if any witness, party or attorney is guilty of any 4contempt while in attendance at any hearing, the arbitration 5panel may, or the attorney general if requested shall, invoke 6the aid of any circuit court within the jurisdiction in which 7the hearing is being held, which court shall issue an 8appropriate order. Any failure to obey the order may be 9punished by the court as contempt.10    (f) At any time before the rendering of an award, the 11chairman of the arbitration panel, if he is of the opinion that 12it would be useful or beneficial to do so, may remand the 13dispute to the parties for further collective bargaining for a 14period not to exceed 2 weeks. If the dispute is remanded for 15further collective bargaining the time provisions of this Act 16shall be extended for a time period equal to that of the 17remand. The chairman of the panel of arbitration shall notify 18the Board of the remand.19    (g) At or before the conclusion of the hearing held 20pursuant to subsection (d), the arbitration panel shall 21identify the economic issues in dispute, and direct each of 22the parties to submit, within such time limit as the panel 23shall prescribe, to the arbitration panel and to each other 24its last offer of settlement on each economic issue. The 25determination of the arbitration panel as to the issues in 26dispute and as to which of these issues are economic shall be   HB2480- 6 -LRB104 08612 BDA 18664 b1conclusive. The arbitration panel, within 30 days after the 2conclusion of the hearing, or such further additional periods 3to which the parties may agree, shall make written findings of 4fact and promulgate a written opinion and shall mail or 5otherwise deliver a true copy thereof to the parties and their 6representatives and to the Board. As to each economic issue, 7the arbitration panel shall adopt the last offer of settlement 8which, in the opinion of the arbitration panel, more nearly 9complies with the applicable factors prescribed in subsection 10(h). The findings, opinions and order as to all other issues 11shall be based upon the applicable factors prescribed in 12subsection (h).13    (h) Where there is no agreement between the parties, or 14where there is an agreement but the parties have begun 15negotiations or discussions looking to a new agreement or 16amendment of the existing agreement, and wage rates or other 17conditions of employment under the proposed new or amended 18agreement are in dispute, the arbitration panel shall base its 19findings, opinions and order upon the following factors, as 20applicable:21        (1) The lawful authority of the employer.22        (2) Stipulations of the parties.23        (3) The interests and welfare of the public and the 24    financial ability of the unit of government to meet those 25    costs.26        (4) Comparison of the wages, hours and conditions of   HB2480- 7 -LRB104 08612 BDA 18664 b1    employment of the employees involved in the arbitration 2    proceeding with the wages, hours and conditions of 3    employment of other employees performing similar services 4    and with other employees generally:5            (A) In public employment in comparable 6        communities.7            (B) In private employment in comparable 8        communities.9        (5) The average consumer prices for goods and 10    services, commonly known as the cost of living.11        (6) The overall compensation presently received by the 12    employees, including direct wage compensation, vacations, 13    holidays and other excused time, insurance and pensions, 14    medical and hospitalization benefits, the continuity and 15    stability of employment and all other benefits received.16        (7) Changes in any of the foregoing circumstances 17    during the pendency of the arbitration proceedings.18        (8) Such other factors, not confined to the foregoing, 19    which are normally or traditionally taken into 20    consideration in the determination of wages, hours and 21    conditions of employment through voluntary collective 22    bargaining, mediation, fact-finding, arbitration or 23    otherwise between the parties, in the public service or in 24    private employment.25    (i) In the case of peace officers, the arbitration 26decision shall be limited to wages, hours, and conditions of   HB2480- 8 -LRB104 08612 BDA 18664 b1employment (which may include residency requirements in 2municipalities with a population under 1,000,000 100,000, but 3those residency requirements shall not allow residency outside 4of Illinois) and shall not include the following: i) residency 5requirements in municipalities with a population of at least 61,000,000 100,000; ii) the type of equipment, other than 7uniforms, issued or used; iii) manning; iv) the total number 8of employees employed by the department; v) mutual aid and 9assistance agreements to other units of government; and vi) 10the criterion pursuant to which force, including deadly force, 11can be used; provided, nothing herein shall preclude an 12arbitration decision regarding equipment or manning levels if 13such decision is based on a finding that the equipment or 14manning considerations in a specific work assignment involve a 15serious risk to the safety of a peace officer beyond that which 16is inherent in the normal performance of police duties. 17Limitation of the terms of the arbitration decision pursuant 18to this subsection shall not be construed to limit the factors 19upon which the decision may be based, as set forth in 20subsection (h).21    In the case of fire fighter, and fire department or fire 22district paramedic matters, the arbitration decision shall be 23limited to wages, hours, and conditions of employment 24(including manning and also including residency requirements 25in municipalities with a population under 1,000,000, but those 26residency requirements shall not allow residency outside of   HB2480- 9 -LRB104 08612 BDA 18664 b1Illinois) and shall not include the following matters: i) 2residency requirements in municipalities with a population of 3at least 1,000,000; ii) the type of equipment (other than 4uniforms and fire fighter turnout gear) issued or used; iii) 5the total number of employees employed by the department; iv) 6mutual aid and assistance agreements to other units of 7government; and v) the criterion pursuant to which force, 8including deadly force, can be used; provided, however, 9nothing herein shall preclude an arbitration decision 10regarding equipment levels if such decision is based on a 11finding that the equipment considerations in a specific work 12assignment involve a serious risk to the safety of a fire 13fighter beyond that which is inherent in the normal 14performance of fire fighter duties. Limitation of the terms of 15the arbitration decision pursuant to this subsection shall not 16be construed to limit the facts upon which the decision may be 17based, as set forth in subsection (h).18    The changes to this subsection (i) made by Public Act 1990-385 (relating to residency requirements) do not apply to 20persons who are employed by a combined department that 21performs both police and firefighting services; these persons 22shall be governed by the provisions of this subsection (i) 23relating to peace officers, as they existed before the 24amendment by Public Act 90-385.25    To preserve historical bargaining rights, this subsection 26shall not apply to any provision of a fire fighter collective   HB2480- 10 -LRB104 08612 BDA 18664 b1bargaining agreement in effect and applicable on the effective 2date of this Act; provided, however, nothing herein shall 3preclude arbitration with respect to any such provision.4    (j) Arbitration procedures shall be deemed to be initiated 5by the filing of a letter requesting mediation as required 6under subsection (a) of this Section. The commencement of a 7new municipal fiscal year after the initiation of arbitration 8procedures under this Act, but before the arbitration 9decision, or its enforcement, shall not be deemed to render a 10dispute moot, or to otherwise impair the jurisdiction or 11authority of the arbitration panel or its decision. Increases 12in rates of compensation awarded by the arbitration panel may 13be effective only at the start of the fiscal year next 14commencing after the date of the arbitration award. If a new 15fiscal year has commenced either since the initiation of 16arbitration procedures under this Act or since any mutually 17agreed extension of the statutorily required period of 18mediation under this Act by the parties to the labor dispute 19causing a delay in the initiation of arbitration, the 20foregoing limitations shall be inapplicable, and such awarded 21increases may be retroactive to the commencement of the fiscal 22year, any other statute or charter provisions to the contrary, 23notwithstanding. At any time the parties, by stipulation, may 24amend or modify an award of arbitration.25    (k) Orders of the arbitration panel shall be reviewable, 26upon appropriate petition by either the public employer or the   HB2480- 11 -LRB104 08612 BDA 18664 b1exclusive bargaining representative, by the circuit court for 2the county in which the dispute arose or in which a majority of 3the affected employees reside, but only for reasons that the 4arbitration panel was without or exceeded its statutory 5authority; the order is arbitrary, or capricious; or the order 6was procured by fraud, collusion or other similar and unlawful 7means. Such petitions for review must be filed with the 8appropriate circuit court within 90 days following the 9issuance of the arbitration order. The pendency of such 10proceeding for review shall not automatically stay the order 11of the arbitration panel. The party against whom the final 12decision of any such court shall be adverse, if such court 13finds such appeal or petition to be frivolous, shall pay 14reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the successful party 15as determined by said court in its discretion. If said court's 16decision affirms the award of money, such award, if 17retroactive, shall bear interest at the rate of 12 percent per 18annum from the effective retroactive date.19    (l) During the pendency of proceedings before the 20arbitration panel, existing wages, hours, and other conditions 21of employment shall not be changed by action of either party 22without the consent of the other but a party may so consent 23without prejudice to his rights or position under this Act. 24The proceedings are deemed to be pending before the 25arbitration panel upon the initiation of arbitration 26procedures under this Act.  HB2480- 12 -LRB104 08612 BDA 18664 b1    (m) Security officers of public employers, and Peace 2Officers, Fire Fighters and fire department and fire 3protection district paramedics, covered by this Section may 4not withhold services, nor may public employers lock out or 5prevent such employees from performing services at any time.6    (n) All of the terms decided upon by the arbitration panel 7shall be included in an agreement to be submitted to the public 8employer's governing body for ratification and adoption by 9law, ordinance or the equivalent appropriate means.10    The governing body shall review each term decided by the 11arbitration panel. If the governing body fails to reject one 12or more terms of the arbitration panel's decision by a 3/5 vote 13of those duly elected and qualified members of the governing 14body, within 20 days of issuance, or in the case of 15firefighters employed by a state university, at the next 16regularly scheduled meeting of the governing body after 17issuance, such term or terms shall become a part of the 18collective bargaining agreement of the parties. If the 19governing body affirmatively rejects one or more terms of the 20arbitration panel's decision, it must provide reasons for such 21rejection with respect to each term so rejected, within 20 22days of such rejection and the parties shall return to the 23arbitration panel for further proceedings and issuance of a 24supplemental decision with respect to the rejected terms. Any 25supplemental decision by an arbitration panel or other 26decision maker agreed to by the parties shall be submitted to   HB2480- 13 -LRB104 08612 BDA 18664 b1the governing body for ratification and adoption in accordance 2with the procedures and voting requirements set forth in this 3Section. The voting requirements of this subsection shall 4apply to all disputes submitted to arbitration pursuant to 5this Section notwithstanding any contrary voting requirements 6contained in any existing collective bargaining agreement 7between the parties.8    (o) If the governing body of the employer votes to reject 9the panel's decision, the parties shall return to the panel 10within 30 days from the issuance of the reasons for rejection 11for further proceedings and issuance of a supplemental 12decision. All reasonable costs of such supplemental proceeding 13including the exclusive representative's reasonable attorney's 14fees, as established by the Board, shall be paid by the 15employer.16    (p) Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section the 17employer and exclusive representative may agree to submit 18unresolved disputes concerning wages, hours, terms and 19conditions of employment to an alternative form of impasse 20resolution.21    The amendatory changes to this Section made by Public Act 22101-652 take effect July 1, 2022. 23(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 7-1-21; 102-28, eff. 6-25-21.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.